Massachusetts, session 194th, S149.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, within one year of the date of
enactment, the executive office of health and human services shall create and maintain an
integrated state plan to develop training and education as well as standards of care by appropriate
healthcare providers related to the diagnosis, treatment, and care of patients with intellectual and
developmental disabilities, including autism spectrum disorders and those with intersecting
marginalized identities. The plan should include implementation steps and recommendations
from the advisory committee on intellectual and developmental disabilities that includes, but is
not limited to: (1) continuing education requirements for applicable healthcare providers related
to diagnosis, treatment, and care of patients with intellectual and developmental disabilities,
of 3

including autism spectrum disorders and those with intersecting marginalized identities,
inclusive of the physical and psychological impacts of emergency department boarding and
strategies to support patients and families when boarding is unavoidable; (2) implementation of a
strategy for the adoption of standards for improving assessment and diagnosis of intellectual and
developmental disabilities, including autism spectrum disorders and those with intersecting
marginalized identities, for patients during routine outpatient primary care examinations; and (3)
coordination with applicable state licensure boards, as recommended by the advisory committee
on intellectual and developmental disabilities, the adoption of appropriate continuing education
requirements related to intellectual and developmental disabilities, including autism spectrum
disorders and those with intersecting marginalized identities, as part of licensure renewals.
Within six months of the date of enactment, there is hereby established an advisory
committee on intellectual and developmental disabilities, including autism spectrum disorders
and those with intersecting marginalized identities. Said advisory committee shall be comprised
of the following experts: (i) a designee of the secretary of health and human services; (ii) a
designee of the commissioner of public health; (iii) two health care providers with expertise in
the diagnosis, treatment, and care of patients with intellectual and developmental disabilities,
including autism spectrum disorders and those with intersecting marginalized identities; (iv) two
patient advocates or family members of those with intellectual and developmental disabilities,
including autism spectrum disorders and those with intersecting marginalized identities; and (iv)
five statewide trade organizations that include the Arc of Massachusetts, the Massachusetts
Health and Hospital Association, the Massachusetts Medical Society, and Massachusetts
Psychiatric Society, and the Massachusetts Psychological Association. The advisory council
shall develop recommendations for statewide standards for healthcare professionals regarding
of 3

diagnosis, treatment, and care for patients with intellectual and developmental disabilities,
including but not limited to, autism spectrum disorders and those with intersecting marginalized
identities. Said standards shall include recommendations for training of healthcare providers,
including but not limited to, physicians, psychologists, psychiatrists, physician assistants,
registered nurses, and advanced practice registered nurses.
of 3